Hawaii, session 2026, SB3055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 89, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§89-    Employee organization representative; false impersonation; prohibited; cause of action; penalties.  (a) No person shall falsely impersonate an employee organization representative. (b)  An employee organization alleging a violation of this section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief; payment of damages, which may include punitive damages; or other appropriate relief. (c)  In addition to any other damages that may be claimed, a plaintiff shall receive liquidated damages in an amount of $           per incident in any action in which the plaintiff establishes that the defendant falsely impersonated an employee organization representative. (d)  For the purposes of this section: "Employee organization representative" means: (1)  An employee, staff member, or any agent of an employee organization; (2)  A member of an employee organization who serves in an elected or appointed position within the employee organization; or (3)  A public employee who is designated by the exclusive representative as a representative for the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit. "Falsely impersonate an employee organization representative" means to use fraud, misrepresentation, material omission, or deceit in making a verbal or written communication that purports to be authorized or otherwise approved by an employee organization but has not been authorized or approved by the employee organization." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________